Illinois, session 104th, HB1041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 7-5.5 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/7-5.5)7    Sec. 7-5.5. Prohibited use of force by a peace officer.8    (a) A peace officer, or any other person acting under the 9color of law, shall not use a chokehold or restraint above the 10shoulders with risk of asphyxiation in the performance of his 11or her duties, unless deadly force is justified under this 12Article.13    (b) A peace officer, or any other person acting under the 14color of law, shall not use a chokehold or restraint above the 15shoulders with risk of asphyxiation, or any lesser contact 16with the throat or neck area of another, in order to prevent 17the destruction of evidence by ingestion.18    (c) As used in this Section, "chokehold" means applying 19any direct pressure to the throat, windpipe, or airway of 20another. "Chokehold" does not include any holding involving 21contact with the neck that is not intended to reduce the intake 22of air such as a headlock where the only pressure applied is to 23the head.  HB1041- 2 -LRB104 04503 RLC 14530 b1    (d) As used in this Section, "restraint above the 2shoulders with risk of positional asphyxiation" means a use of 3a technique used to restrain a person above the shoulders, 4including the neck or head, in a position which interferes 5with the person's ability to breathe after the person no 6longer poses a threat to the officer or any other person.7    (e) A peace officer, or any other person acting under the 8color of law, shall not:9        (i) use force as punishment or retaliation;10        (ii) discharge kinetic impact projectiles and all 11    other non-lethal or less-lethal projectiles in a manner 12    that targets the head, neck, groin, or anterior pelvis, or 13    back;14        (iii) discharge conducted electrical weapons in a 15    manner that targets the head, chest, neck, groin, or 16    anterior pelvis; 17        (iv) discharge firearms or kinetic impact projectiles 18    indiscriminately into a crowd;19        (v) use chemical agents or irritants for crowd 20    control, including pepper spray and tear gas, prior to 21    issuing an order to disperse in a sufficient manner to 22    allow for the order to be heard and repeated if necessary, 23    followed by sufficient time and space to allow compliance 24    with the order unless providing such time and space would 25    unduly place an officer or another person at risk of death 26    or great bodily harm; or   HB1041- 3 -LRB104 04503 RLC 14530 b1        (vi) use chemical agents or irritants, including 2    pepper spray and tear gas, prior to issuing an order in a 3    sufficient manner to ensure the order is heard, and 4    repeated if necessary, to allow compliance with the order 5    unless providing such time and space would unduly place an 6    officer or another person at risk of death or great bodily 7    harm. 8(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 9102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)